District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.07

Health services.

The Mayor shall establish an employee health services program which shall provide for the following: (1) Treatment of on-the-job injuries and illness requiring emergency treatment; (2) pre-employment and other physical examinations, including fitness-for-duty examinations; (3) a counseling program for “troubled employees”; and (4) preventive programs relating to health. In developing and implementing a health services program consistent with the provisions of this subchapter, maximum use shall be made of existing District government medical and health services facilities, resources and expertise.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2007, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-621.7.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.7.